Hawaii, session 2025, GM1393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. Section 88-47, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
”(a) There shall be four classes of members in the system
to be known as class A, class B, class C, and class H, defined
as follows:
(1) Class A shall consist of:
(A) [Judges,] Members first employed as judges before
July 1, 2031, elected officials, and legislative
officers;
(B) Investigators of the department of the attorney
general, narcotics enforcement investigators,
water safety officers not making the election
under section 88-271, and law enforcement
investigations staff investigators;
(C) Those members in service prior to July 1, 1984,
including those who are on approved leave of
SB935 CDl LRB 25-1831.docx
iiniiiHiiiiiiiiiiiiiinii

Page 2
S.B. NO. ^2
CD. 1
absence, not making the election to become a
class C member as provided in part VII or to
become a class H member as provided in part VIII;
(D) The following members in service prior to July 1,
2006, including those who are on approved leave
of absence, not making the election to become a
class H member as provided in part VIII:
(i) Members whose salaries are set forth in
sections 26-52 and 26-53 and their county
counterparts, managing directors or an
administrative assistant to the mayor, other
county department heads, and agency heads
appointed and subject to removal by the
mayor;
(ii) First deputies appointed by the county
attorney and prosecuting attorney;
(iii) The county clerk and deputy county clerk of
each county;
(iv) The directors of the offices of council
services of the county of Maui and the city
and county of Honolulu;
SB935 CDl LRB 25-1831.docx
■IIIIIHIIIIIIIIIIIIIIilllll

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(v) The administrative director of the courts;
(vi) The deputy administrative director of the
courts;
(vii) The executive officer of the labor and
industrial relations appeals board; and
(viii) The executive officer of the Hawaii labor
. relations board;
(E) All former class A retirants who return to
employment after June 30, 1984, requiring the
retirant's active membership; and
(F) All former class B retirants who return to
employment requiring the retirant's active
membership, except for:
(i) Former retirants who return in the positions
of police officer or firefighter;
(ii) Former retirants who were members on July 1,
1957, who elected not to be covered by the
Social Security Act; and
(iii) Former retirants who were in positions to
which coverage under Title II of the Social
Security Act was not extended who entered
SB935 CDl LRB 25-1831.docx
■iiiiHiHniimiiiniii

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
membership after June 30, 1957, but before
January 1, 2004;
(2) Class B shall consist of:
(A) Police officers and firefighters, including
former retirants who return to service in such
capacity;
(B) All employees, including former retirants, who
were members on July 1, 1957, who elected not to
be covered by the Social Security Act; and
(C) All employees, including former retirants, in
positions to which coverage under Title II of the
Social Security Act is not extended, who enter
membership after June 30, 1957, but before
January 1, 2004, not making the election to
become a class H member as provided in part VIII;
(3) Except for members described in paragraphs (1) and
(2), class C shall consist of all employees, not
making the election to become a class H member as
provided in part VIII, who:
(A) First enter service after June 30, 1984, but
before July 1, 2006;
SB935 GDI LRB 25-1831.docx
■IIMIHIIIIIIIIIDiil

Page 5 935
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
(B) Reenter service after June 30, 1984, but before
July 1, 2006, without vested benefit status as
provided in section 88-96(b);
(C) Make the election to become a class C member as
provided in part VII; or
(D) Are former class C retirants who return to
service requiring the retirant's active
membership; and
(4) Except for members described in paragraphs (1) and
(2), class H shall consist of all employees who:
(A) First enter service after June 30, 2006;
(B) Reenter service after June 30, 2006, without
vested benefit status as provided in
section 88-96(b);
(C) Make the election to become a class H member as
provided in part VIII; [et]
(D) Are former class H retirants who return to
service requiring the retirant's active
membership[—]; or
(E) Are first employed as a judge after June 30,
2031.”
SB935 CDl LRB 25-1831.docx 5
MIHIIIHilililllH

Page 6
S.B. NO.
■ • H.D.3
CD. 1
SECTION 2. Section 88-74, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows:
"(d) If a member, who became a member before July 1, 2012,
has credited service as an elective officer or as a legislative
officer, the member's retirement allowance shall be derived by
adding the allowances computed separately under paragraphs (1),
(2), (3), (4), (5), and (6) as follows:
(1) For a member who has credited service as an elective
officer before July 1, 2012, irrespective of age, for
each year of credited service as an elective officer,
three and one-half per cent of the member's average
final compensation as computed under
section 88-81 (e) (1), in addition to an annuity that is
the actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated
contributions allocable to the period of service;
(2) For a member, who first earned credited service as an
elective officer after June 30, 2012, irrespective of
age, for each year of credited service as an elective
officer, three per cent of the member's average final
compensation as computed under section 88-81(e) (1), in
addition to an annuity that is the actuarial
SB935 CDl LRB 25-1831.docx 6
■HHIIHIfflllllillMIII

Page 7 935
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
equivalent of the member's accumulated contributions
allocable to the period of service;
(3) For a member who has credited service as a legislative
officer before July 1, 2012, irrespective of age, for
each year of credited service as a legislative
officer, three and one-half per cent of the member's
average final compensation as computed under
section 88-81(e) (2), in addition to an annuity that is
the actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated
contributions allocable to the period of service;
(4) For a member who first earned credited service as a
legislative officer after June 30, 2012, irrespective
of age, for each year of credited service as a
legislative officer, three per cent of the member's
average final compensation as computed under
section 88-81(e)(2), in addition to an annuity that is
the actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated
contributions allocable to the period of service;
(5) If the member has credited service as a judge, the
member's retirement allowance shall be computed on the
following basis:
SB935 GDI LRB 25-1831.docx 7
■miinHiniiiiiniiiiini

Page 8
S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
(A) For a member who has credited service as a judge
before July 1, 1999, irrespective of age, for
each year of credited service as a judge, three
and one-half per cent of the member's average
final compensation as computed under
section 88-81(e) (3), in addition to an annuity
that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's
accumulated contributions allocable to the period
of service;
(B) For a member who first earned credited service as
a judge after June 30, 1999, but before July 1,
2012, and has attained the age of fifty-five, for
each year of credited service as a judge, three
and one-half per cent of the member's average
final compensation as computed under
section 88-81(e) (3), in addition to an annuity
that is the actuarial equivalent of the member's
accumulated contributions allocable to the period
of service. If the member has not attained age
fifty-five, the member's retirement allowance
shall be computed as though the member had
SB935 GDI LRB 25-1831.docx

Page 9
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
attained age fifty-five, reduced for age as
provided in subsection (e) ;
(C) For a member who first earned credited service as
a judge after June 30, 2012, but before July 1,
2031, and has attained the age of sixty, for each
year of credited service as a judge, three per
cent of the member's average final compensation
as computed under section 88-81 (e) (3), in
addition to an annuity that is the actuarial
equivalent of the member's accumulated
contributions allocable to the period of service.
If the member has not attained age sixty, the
member's retirement allowance shall be computed
as though the member had attained age sixty,
reduced for age as provided in subsection (i);
and
(D) For a member who first earned credited service as
a judge after June 30, 2031, and has attained the
a2e of si2<t^.j f£r each year of cred£ted service
as a judge, one and three-fourths per cent of the
member's average final compensation as computed
SB935 CDl LRB 25-1831.docx
iMIIHIIIIIilllUIIIIIIII

Page 10
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
under section 88-81 (e) (3), in addition to an
annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the
member's accumulated contributions allocable to
the period of service. If the member has not
attained age sixty, the member's retirement
allowance shall be computed as though the member
had attained age sixty, reduced for age as
provided in subsection (i); and
(6) For each year of credited service not included in
paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5), the average
final compensation as computed under
section 88-81(e) (4) shall be multiplied by two per
cent for credited service earned as a class A or class
H member, two and one-half per cent for credited
service earned as a class B member, and one and
one-quarter per cent for credited service earned as a
class C member. If the member has not attained age
fifty-five, the member's retirement allowance shall be
computed as though the member had attained age
fifty-five, reduced for age as provided in
subsection (e).
SB935 CDl LRB 25-1831.docx 10
iHiiiiiiniiiiniiiitiiHii

Page 11 S.B. NO.
^2
C.D. 1
The total retirement allowance shall not exceed seventy-five per
cent of the member's highest average final compensation
calculated under section 88-81(e)(1), (2), (3), or (4). If the
allowance exceeds this limit, it shall be adjusted by reducing
any annuity accrued under paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5)
and the portion of the accumulated contributions specified in
these paragraphs in excess of the requirements of the reduced
annuity shall be returned to the member upon the member's
retirement or paid to the member's designated beneficiary upon
the member's death while in service or while on authorized leave
without pay. If a member has service credit as an elective
officer or as a legislative officer in addition to service
credit as a judge, then the retirement benefit calculation
contained in this subsection shall supersede the formula
contained in subsection (c)."
PART II
SECTION 3. (a) The department of human resources
development shall conduct a study of the impacts and benefits of
reducing, from ten years to five years, the minimum number of
years of credited service that qualified tier 2 hybrid class
members of the employees' retirement system must have to be
SB935 CDl LRB 25-1831.docx 1
iiiimiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 12 935
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
eligible for vested benefit status for service retirement
allowance purposes.
(b) The department of human resources development shall
submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including
any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of
2027.
(c) As used in this section, "tier 2 hybrid class member
of the employees' retirement system" means a person who became a
member of the employees' retirement system under part VIII of
chapter 88, Hawaii Revised Statutes, after June 30, 2012.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $300,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the
department of human resources development to conduct the study
pursuant to section 3 of this part.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
human resources development for the purposes of this part.
PART III
SECTION 5. This Act does not affect the rights, duties,
benefits, and obligations that matured or were vested, or
SB935 CDl LRB 25-1831.docx 1
■niniiiMiiiiiiii

Page 13
S.B. NO. S.2
I 'I 3
C.D. 1
proceedings that were begun, before its effective date,
including but not limited to any membership that was terminated,
credited service that was forfeited, retirement that was
finalized, or benefits that were paid.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
SB935 CDl LRB 25-1831.docx 13
■niBiiHiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

S.B. NO. g.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of July , 2025

S.B. No. 935, S.D. 2, H.D. 3, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai'i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
162

SB No. 935, SD 2, HD 3, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives